Arkansas, session 2025, HB1607.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-270-202(a), concerning the
elements of the FUN Parks Grants Program, is amended to read as follows:
(a) There is hereby established the FUN Parks Grants Program to be
administered by the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism Office of
Outdoor Recreation.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 14-270-203 is amended to read as follows:
14-270-203. Authorization.
The Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism Office of Outdoor
Recreation is herein authorized to may promulgate procedures, rules, or
guidelines necessary for the administration of the FUN Parks Grants Program.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 25, Chapter 43, Subchapter 13, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
25-43-1310. Office of Outdoor Recreation — Creation — Powers and
Duties.
*LGL089*
02/26/2025 11:17:46 AM LGL089

HB1607
(a) There is created the Office of Outdoor Recreation within the
Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism.
(b) The Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism
may delegate duties and responsibilities to the office.
(c)(1) The secretary may employ a Director of the Office of Outdoor
Recreation.
(2) The director shall serve as the coordinator for the
development of an organizational framework to ensure that outdoor recreation
programs and policies are well-planned and coordinated.
(3)(A) The director, in cooperation with the Parks, Recreation,
and Tourism Grant Advisory Committee, shall administer the FUN Parks Grants
Program under § 14-270-202.
(B) Funding for the FUN Parks Grants Program shall be from
the Parks and Tourism Outdoor Recreation Grants Fund as specified in § 19-5-
1051.
(d) The office shall promulgate rules necessary for the implementation
and maintenance of the FUN Parks Grants Program including without limitation
rules concerning the:
(1) Grant application procedure;
(2) Grant selection criteria;
(3) Usage limitations on grant money; and
(4) Accountability procedures for grant recipients.
(e) The director shall provide an annual written report to the State
Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission on the activities of the office.












02/26/2025 11:17:46 AM LGL089